District of Columbia statutes.
29-709.02

Derivative action.

A partner may maintain a derivative action in the Superior Court to enforce a right of a limited partnership if:

(1)

The partner first makes a demand on the general partners, requesting that they cause the limited partnership to bring an action to enforce the right, and the general partners do not bring the action within a reasonable time; or

(2)

A demand would be futile.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1002 of the Uniform Limited Partnership Act (2001 Act).